Utah statutes.
20A-9-501.   Candidates not affiliated with a party -- General requirements.

(1) (a)  Candidates for public office who do not wish to affiliate with a registered political party may obtain a position on the ballot by following the procedures and requirements of this part.

(b)  Upon compliance with the provisions of this part, the unaffiliated candidate is entitled to all the rights and subject to all the penalties of candidates selected by a registered political party.

(2)  A candidate who has filed a declaration of candidacy may not file a certificate of nomination as an unaffiliated candidate in the same year.

(3)  The courts shall construe this part liberally so as to give unaffiliated candidates for public office every reasonable opportunity to make their candidacy effective.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1994 General Session

